Utah statutes.
26-6-11.   Rabies or other animal disease -- Investigation and order of quarantine.

Whenever rabies or any other animal disease dangerous to the health of human beings is reported, the department shall investigate to determine whether such  disease exists, and the probable area of the state in which man or beast is thereby endangered. If the department finds that such disease exists, a quarantine may be declared against all animals designated in the quarantine order and within the area specified in the order. If the quarantine is for the purpose of preventing the spread of rabies or hydrophobia, the order shall contain a warning to the owners of dogs within the quarantined area to confine or muzzle all dogs to prevent biting. Any dog not muzzled found running at large in a quarantined area or any dog known to have been removed from or escaped from such area, may be killed by any person without liability therefor.



Enacted by Chapter 126, 1981 General Session

